California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(b) Lists elements a county or city shall include in its oak woodlands management plan. Items included in the plan shall assist a county or a city to specify conservation priorities and prevent oak woodlands habitat fragmentation while minimizing the cost and administrative burden associated with developing the plan. The elements may include any or all of the following:

(1) Tree inventory mapping.

(2) Oak canopy retention standards.

(3) Oak habitat mitigation measures.

(4) A procedure to monitor the effectiveness of the plan and to modify the plan as necessary.

(c) Designates an online repository for oak woodlands management plans that will be easily accessible to the public and any other state agency involved in oak woodlands conservation efforts.

(d) Discusses the relationship between oak woodlands conservation efforts under this article and efforts by other state agencies to protect oak woodlands, including efforts to combat sudden oak death, and outlines a plan, as necessary, for coordinating with these agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1368.

The board may not approve a grant to a local government entity, park and open-space district, resource conservation district, or nonprofit organization if the entity requesting the grant has acquired, or proposes to acquire, an oak woodlands conservation easement through the use of eminent domain, unless the owner of the affected lands requests the owner to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1369.

A city or county planning department may utilize a grant awarded for the purposes of this article to consult with a citizen advisory committee and appropriate natural resource specialists in order to report publicly to the city council or the board of supervisors on the status of the city’s or county’s oak woodlands. Each city or county planning department that receives a grant for the purposes of this article shall report to the city council or to the board of supervisors of the county, as appropriate, on the use of those grant funds within one year from the date the grant is received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.

No money may be expended from the fund to adopt guidelines or to administer the fund until at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) is deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1372.

Nothing in this article grants any new authority to the board or any other agency, office, or department to affect local policy or land use decisionmaking.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Monarch Butterfly and Pollinator Rescue Program [1374. - 1374.1.]

1374.

(a) The Monarch Butterfly and Pollinator Rescue Program is hereby established and shall be administered by the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(b) The purpose of the program is to recover and sustain populations of monarch butterflies and other pollinators.

(c) To achieve the purposes of the program, the Wildlife Conservation Board may do all of the following:

(1) Provide grants for the restoration or enhancement of California prairie and other appropriate breeding habitat for monarch butterflies and pollinators on private and public
 lands.

(2) Provide grants for the restoration or enhancement of overwintering monarch butterfly habitat on private and public lands.

(3) Provide technical assistance to grant recipients, including farmers and ranchers, regarding restoration and enhancement of breeding, overwintering, and other appropriate monarch butterfly habitat.

(4) Award grants pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Provide grants for seasonal or temporary habitat improvements.

(6) Provide block grants in which suballocations are made by the grant recipient, with the approval of the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(d) Eligible recipients for grants under the program include private landowners, nonprofit organizations, resource conservation districts, or public agencies.

(e) (1)   Before disbursing a grant pursuant to this article, the Wildlife Conservation Board shall develop and adopt project selection and evaluation guidelines. The guidelines shall include monitoring and reporting requirements to help assess grant outcomes.

(2) The Wildlife Conservation Board shall coordinate with the Department of Food and Agriculture in developing program guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 760, Sec. 2.   (AB 2421)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1374.1.

(a) The Monarch Butterfly and Pollinator Rescue Fund Account is hereby created in the State Treasury. The account shall be administered by the Wildlife Conservation Board. Moneys in the account may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this article.

(b) Moneys may be deposited into the account from gifts, donations, funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this article, or from federal grants or other sources, and shall be used for the purpose of implementing this article, including administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 760, Sec. 2.   (AB 2421)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cooperation With United States [1375. - 1375.]

1375.

The board may act either independently or may cooperate with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, Department of Interior, or any other federal agency in determining any of the questions referred to in this chapter, or in the acquisition and construction of any of the projects mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.1. California Riparian Habitat Conservation Program [1385. - 1391.]

1385.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Riparian Habitat Conservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1386.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s rivers, wetlands, and waterways, and the fisheries and wildlife habitat they provide, are valuable and finite resources that benefit the people of the state and are threatened with deterioration or degeneration that may endanger the natural beauty and productivity of these valuable resources. 

(b) The public interest requires the coordinated protection of rivers and riparian resources in order to maintain an equilibrium between the natural endowment of, and manmade alterations to, California’s river environment, and in order to preserve the scenic beauty of these natural resources and the recreational and economic benefits they provide. 

(c) By virtue of the special conditions and circumstances of the natural ecology, the increasing human populations and needs in the state, and the numerous governmental agencies with an interest in coordinating activities which affect rivers and riparian habitat resources, there is a need for a coordinated state rivers and riparian habitat protection program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1387.

The Wildlife Conservation Board shall establish and administer, through the department, the California Riparian Habitat Conservation Program pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300). The purpose and goal of the program is to protect, preserve, and restore riparian habitats throughout the state by the acquisition of interests and rights in real property and waters to the extent deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1388.

The board, pursuant to this chapter, shall approve projects to acquire, preserve, restore, and enhance riparian habitat throughout the state, and coordinate its activities undertaken pursuant to this program with other resources protection activities of the board and other state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.

The preservation and enhancement of riparian habitat shall be a primary concern of the Wildlife Conservation Board and the department, and of all state agencies whose activities impact riparian habitat, including the Department of Conservation, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the State Coastal Conservancy, the California Conservation Corps, the California Tahoe Conservancy, the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, the California Coastal Commission, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, and the State Lands Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 94.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1390.

In order to accomplish the objectives of this chapter, the Wildlife Conservation Board may authorize the department to do all of the following:

(a) Acquire interests in real property and water rights through gift, purchase, lease, easement, and transfer or exchange of easements, development rights or credits, and other interests in real property. 

(b) Coordinate its activities under the program with any governmental program for surplus real property sales in the state. 

(c) Award grants and loans to local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this program.

(d) For the purposes of this chapter, “nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization which qualifies for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and has among its principal charitable purposes the preservation of real property for scientific, historic, educational, recreational, scenic or open-space values, the protection of the natural environment, or the preservation and enhancement of fisheries and wildlife or their habitat. 

(e) Exercise any authority and comply with requirements contained in Sections 1348 and 1350, as appropriate, to preserve and enhance riparian habitat for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

Grants to nonprofit organizations pursuant to Section 1390 for the acquisition of real property or interests therein shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The purchase price of any interest in real property acquired by the nonprofit organization may not exceed fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the Wildlife Conservation Board. 

(b) The Wildlife Conservation Board approves the terms under which the interest in real property is acquired.

(c) The interest in real property acquired pursuant to a grant from the Wildlife Conservation Board may not be used as security for any debt to be incurred by the nonprofit organization unless the board approves the transaction. 

(d) The transfer of real property acquired pursuant to a grant shall be subject to the approval of the Wildlife Conservation Board and the execution of an agreement between the board and the transferee sufficient to protect the interest of the State of California. 

(e) The state shall have a right of entry and power of termination in and over all interests in real property acquired with state funds, which may be exercised if any essential term or condition of the grant is violated. 

(f) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state. However, prior to that termination, upon approval of the board, another public agency or nonprofit organization may receive title to all or a portion of that interest in real property by recording its acceptance of title in writing. Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is being acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be recorded and shall set forth the executory interest or right of entry on the part of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Inland Wetlands Conservation Program [1400. - 1431.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1400. - 1405.]

1400.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

“Fund” means the Inland Wetlands Conservation Fund, created in the Wildlife Restoration Fund by Section 1430.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

“Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board created by Section 1320.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

“Inland areas” means the entire area of California except lands under the jurisdiction of the State Coastal Conservancy, lands within the Santa Monica Mountains Zone, as defined in Section 33105 of the Public Resources Code, and lands under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy Agency in the Lake Tahoe region, as defined in Section 66905.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1404.

“Program” means the Inland Wetlands Conservation Program, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

“Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in subsection (c) of Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States (26 U.S.C. 501(c)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Inland Wetlands Conservation Program [1410. - 1422.]

1410.

The Inland Wetlands Conservation Program is hereby created in the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1411.

(a) The Inland Wetlands Conservation Program is the program designated for use of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2791, as enacted by the California Wildlife Protection Act of 1990. The board shall administer the program.

(b) The board is the agency designated for receipt of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2791, as enacted by the California Wildlife Protection Act of 1990.

(c) The purpose and goal of the program is to carry out the programs of the Central Valley Habitat Joint Venture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1412.

The board may apply for and accept federal grants and receive gifts, donations, subventions, rent, royalties, and other financial support from public and private sources for the purposes of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1413.

The board may acquire or accept the gift or dedication of fee title, easements, leases, development rights, or other interests in lands in inland areas necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1414.

The board shall coordinate its activities in the program with federal surplus land sales in inland areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1415.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any land, interest in land, or option acquired pursuant to this chapter for the purposes of carrying out the program. 

(b) The proceeds from any lease, rental, sale, exchange, or transfer of land, or any interest therein, or option thereon, shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1416.

The board may make grants or loans to nonprofit organizations, local governmental agencies, and state departments and agencies for the purpose of wetland and associated upland habitat acquisition, restoration, or enhancement in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as prescribed in Section 31116 of the Public Resources Code. Proceeds from repayment of any loans and the interest thereon shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.

The board may lease nonwetlands habitat in need of restoration to nonprofit organizations, local governmental agencies, and state departments and agencies under agreements in which the lessee agrees to restore the wetlands to their highest possible wetland value and maintain the wetlands at that highest possible wetland value. Proceeds from any lease or rental and interest thereon shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1418.

The board may acquire former wetlands and associated upland habitat, restore those areas, and sell the lands, or any interest therein, to private owners, local governmental agencies, and state departments and agencies or exchange them for other land, if an agreement is secured to keep and maintain the lands as wetlands in perpetuity. The agreement shall contain a reversion if the lands sold or exchanged are not maintained as wetlands. The agreement containing the reversion shall be set forth in any conveyance transferring any land, interest in land, or option subject to this section. Proceeds from the sales or exchanges shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1419.

Any funds remaining after an eligible acquisition, restoration, or enhancement of any project under this article shall be returned to the board and shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1420.

In reviewing any grant or loan application, preference shall be given to projects on wetlands that have a secure source of water or are adjacent to existing wetlands that are protected by public ownership or conservation easements, or both. The board shall give preference to wintering habitat in the central valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

When creating new wetlands, the board shall give preference to lands most suitable for this purpose due to elevations, existence of levees, proximity to existing wetlands that are protected, and potential sources of water. These potential sources of water are limited to all of the following:

(a) Water rights which are attached to the land to be restored including groundwater associated with the property.

(b) Water willingly made available for a wetlands conservation project through water conservation.

(c) Recycled water.

(d) Undeveloped water supplies of the state.

(e) Water marketed for wetlands purposes by a willing seller.

(f) Water otherwise made available for wetlands purposes by private, nonprofit, local, and regional entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1422.

On or before January 1, 1992, and every third year thereafter, the board shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature on activities of the board under this chapter and other activities relating to wetland acquisition by the board. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) The status of wetland acquisition, restoration, and enhancement projects in inland areas.

(b) The net increase of wetland habitat as a result of projects of the board, including the activities carried out pursuant to the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Finances [1430. - 1431.]

1430.

The Inland Wetlands Conservation Fund is hereby created in the Wildlife Restoration Fund. The money in the fund shall be solely used to carry out the Inland Wetlands Conservation Program, including the administrative costs of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.

The board shall deposit in the fund all allocations made pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2791. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the board to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1645, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.4. California Desert Conservation Program [1450. - 1458.]

1450.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Desert Conservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Mojave and Colorado Deserts region in California, hereafter referred to as “the California deserts region,” are globally significant areas, including national parks and preserves, national monuments, wilderness areas, state parks, and the lowest point in the 48 contiguous states, with large, pristine areas that are open for public use.

(b) The California deserts region is also the ancestral homeland of numerous tribal communities. The region includes cultural, biological, and historical resources on sacred land that should be protected and preserved.

(c) The California deserts region is an important part of the state’s economy, with total direct travel spending in the California deserts region estimated in 2018 at seven billion six hundred million dollars ($7,600,000,000) and by supporting 73,000 jobs. Total government revenue generated by travel in the California deserts region for 2018 was six hundred nine million dollars ($609,000,000).

(d) The California deserts region’s popularity among California and international recreationists has more than doubled within the past five years. Visitation to Joshua Tree National Park increased by 112 percent between 2013 and 2018. During the same time period, visits to Death Valley National Park increased by 76 percent and visits to Mojave National Preserve increased by 43 percent.

(e) The California deserts region provides world-class opportunities for hiking, camping, sightseeing, rock climbing, rock hounding, off-highway vehicle use, and many other recreational activities.

(f) Undisturbed desert lands are known to sequester and store carbon and contribute to climate change resilience.

(g) Nonnative, invasive grasses, such as Mediterranean grass and cheatgrass, create continuous fuel beds across desert lands that can spark and support massive wildfires in areas where fire was previously rare.

(h) The California deserts region is characterized as having high biological diversity. In the Mojave Desert, there is an approximate total
 of 1,500 plant taxa with 210 being endemic to California.

(i) The California deserts region is home to iconic species such as the western Joshua tree (Yucca brevifolia), the federally threatened desert tortoise (Gopherus agassizii), and species of special concern such as the desert bighorn sheep (Ovis canadensis nelsoni), which requires wildlife corridors to maintain healthy populations.

(j) Water sources within the California deserts region are comprised of both groundwater and surface water that provide critical sustenance for unique and diverse ecosystems. Groundwater elevations should be stable and not overdrafted to maintain the surface flow of springs that support the fragile ecosystems in the region. Proposed groundwater extraction projects have threatened water
 supplies in the California deserts region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1452.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(c) “Local public agency” includes, but is not limited to, a city, county, city and county, association of governments, or joint powers authority. 

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal
 Revenue Code of 1986, and has among its principal charitable purposes the preservation of real property for scientific, historic, educational, recreational, scenic, or open-space values, the protection of the natural environment, or the preservation and enhancement of fisheries and wildlife or their habitat.

(e) “Program” means the California Desert Conservation Program.

(f) “Region” or “California deserts region” includes the portions of the Mojave and Colorado Deserts, across 26,000,000 acres of southeastern California lying within the Counties of Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Los Angeles, Mono, Riverside, San Bernardino, and San Diego that is within the California Desert Conservation Area as that area was delineated in the map and legal description of the California Desert
 Conservation Area prepared by the United States Secretary of the Interior pursuant to Section 1781(c) of Title 43 of the United States Code, as that map and legal description was in effect on December 31, 2020, and the portions of the Bureau of Land Management’s Bakersfield and Bishop Resource Management Plans, as amended by the Record of Decision, dated September 14, 2016, of the Desert Renewable Energy Conservation Plan Land Use Plan Amendment. The Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy area, as described in Section 33502 of the Public Resources Code, shall be excluded from, and is not part of, the California deserts region.

(g) “Tribe” means any federally recognized Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage
 Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1453.

The board shall establish and administer, through the department, the program pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300). The purpose and goal of the program is to do all of the following:

(a) Protect, preserve, and restore the region’s natural, cultural, and physical resources through the acquisition, restoration, and management of lands.

(b) Promote the protection and restoration of the biological diversity of the region, including the recovery of threatened and endangered species.

(c) Provide for resilience within the region to
 climate change, including, but not limited to, reducing the risk of natural disasters such as wildfires, controlling invasive species, protecting and improving habitat connectivity, and protecting soil carbon stores by limiting ground disturbance.

(d) Protect and improve air quality and water resources within the region.

(e) Undertake efforts to enhance public use and enjoyment of lands owned by the public, with an emphasis on expanding opportunities for education and access to public lands for communities that currently lack access.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1454.

The board, pursuant to this chapter, shall approve projects to acquire, preserve, restore, and enhance desert habitat within the California deserts region consistent with the conservation strategies approved by the department and coordinate its activities undertaken pursuant to the program with other resource protection activities of the board and other state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1455.

The preservation and restoration of desert habitat shall be a primary concern of the board and the department, and of all state agencies whose activities impact desert
 habitat.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1456.

In order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the board may authorize the department to do all of the following:

(a) Acquire interests in real property and water rights through gift, purchase, lease, easement, and transfer or exchange of easements, development rights or credits, and other interests in real property.

(b) Coordinate its activities under the program with any governmental program for surplus real property sales in the state.

(c) Award grants to local public agencies, state agencies, tribes, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of the
 program.

(d) Exercise any authority and comply with the requirements contained in Sections 1348 and 1350, as appropriate, to preserve and enhance desert habitat for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1457.

Grants to nonprofit organizations, pursuant to Section 1390, for the acquisition of real property or interests therein shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The purchase price of any interest in real property acquired by the nonprofit organization shall not exceed fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the board.

(b) The board approves the terms under which the interest in real property is acquired.

(c) The interest in real property acquired pursuant to a grant from the board shall not be used as security for any debt to be incurred
 by the nonprofit organization unless the board approves the transaction.

(d) The transfer of real property acquired pursuant to a grant shall be subject to the approval of the board and the execution of an agreement between the board and the transferee sufficient to protect the interest of the state.

(e) The state shall have a right of entry and power of termination in and over all interests in real property acquired with state funds, which may be exercised if any essential term or condition of the grant is violated.

(f) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state. However, before that
 termination, upon approval of the board, another public agency or nonprofit organization may receive title to all or a portion of that interest in real property by recording its acceptance of title in writing. Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is being acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be recorded and shall set forth the executory interest or right of entry on the part of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1458.

(a) The California Desert Conservation Program Fund Account is hereby created in the State Treasury. The account shall be administered by the board. Moneys in the account may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Moneys may be deposited into the account from gifts, donations, funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this chapter, federal grants, and other sources. Moneys in the account shall be used for the purpose of implementing this chapter, including administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1183)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Fish and Game Management [1500. - 1591.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [1500. - 1506.]

1500.

The department may, with the approval of the commission and the Department of General Services, exchange any portion of the property lying within the boundaries of any area or range referred to in this section for any property within or contiguous to such area or range or may sell any portion of the property within such boundaries and with the proceeds thereof acquire any property within or contiguous to such area or range; provided, that no exchange or sale of property authorized in this section shall materially reduce the total area of any range or area referred to in this section. A copy of each deed of conveyance executed and delivered by the department, and of each deed conveying lands to the state, pursuant to this section shall be delivered to the State Lands Commission.

The provisions of this section apply to all of the following:

(a) The Doyle Deer Winter Range, located in Lassen County.

(b) The Tehama Deer Winter Range, located in Tehama County.

(c) The Honey Lake Waterfowl Management Area, located in Lassen County.

(d) The Imperial Waterfowl Management Area, located in Imperial County.

(e) The Mendota Waterfowl Management Area, located in Fresno County.

(f) The San Jacinto Wildlife Area, located in Riverside County.

(g) The Lakes Earl/Talawa Wildlife Area, located in Del Norte County.

(h) The Santa Rosa Mountains Bighorn Sheep Reserve, located in Riverside County.

(i) The Camp Cady Wildlife Area, located in San Bernardino County.

(j) The Butte Valley Wildlife Area, located in Siskiyou County.

(k) The Ash Creek Wildlife Area, located in Lassen and Modoc Counties.

(l) The Moss Landing Wildlife Area, located in Monterey County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1500.5.

(a) The following rules govern an exchange or sale of property pursuant to Section 1500:

(1) If a parcel contains 15 acres or less, the director shall except and reserve to the state all mineral deposits below a depth of 500 feet, without surface rights of entry.

(2) If a parcel contains more than 15 acres, the director shall except and reserve to the state all mineral deposits, together with the rights to prospect for, mine, and remove the deposits.

The rights to prospect for, mine, and remove shall be limited to those areas of the property conveyed that the director, after consultation with the State Lands Commission, determines to be reasonably
 necessary for the removal of the resources and deposits.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the mineral deposits reserved to the state are those described in Section 6407 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 19.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

The department may expend such funds as may be necessary for the improvement of property, including nonnavigable lakes and streams, riparian zones, and upland, in order to restore, rehabilitate, and improve fish and wildlife habitat. The improvement activities may include, but are not limited to, the removal of barriers to migration of fish and wildlife and the improvement of hatching, feeding, resting, and breeding places for wildlife.

The department may undertake the services and habitat improvement work on private, public, and public trust lands without the state acquiring an interest in the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1400, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.5.

(a) The department may enter into contracts for fish and wildlife habitat preservation, restoration, and enhancement with public and private entities whenever the department finds that the contracts will assist in meeting the department’s duty to preserve, protect, and restore fish and wildlife.

(b) The department may grant funds for fish and wildlife habitat preservation, restoration, and enhancement to public agencies, Indian tribes, and nonprofit entities whenever the department finds that the grants will assist it in meeting its duty to preserve, protect, and restore fish and wildlife.

(c) (1) Contracts authorized under this section are contracts for services and are governed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) No work under this section is public work or a public improvement, and is not subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(d) This section does not apply to contracts for any of the following:

(1) Construction of office, storage, garage, or maintenance
 buildings.

(2) Drilling wells and installation of pumping equipment.

(3) Construction of permanent hatchery facilities, including raceways, water systems, and bird exclosures.

(4) Construction of permanent surfaced roadways and bridges.

(5) Any project requiring engineered design or certification by a registered engineer.

(6) Any contract, except contracts with public agencies, nonprofit organizations, or Indian tribes that exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in cost, excluding the cost for gravel, for fish and wildlife habitat preservation, restoration, and enhancement for any
 one of the following:

(A) Fish screens, weirs, and ladders.

(B) Drainage or other watershed improvements.

(C) Gravel and rock removal or placement.

(D) Irrigation and water distribution systems.

(E) Earthwork and grading.

(F) Fencing.

(G) Planting trees or other habitat vegetation.

(H) Construction of temporary storage buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 1.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.6.

Notwithstanding Section 1501.5, the department may allocate federal funds and any moneys received as donations for purposes of the Wolf-Livestock Compensation Pilot Program to pay for the deterrence of wolf presence near livestock, the impacts of wolf presence on livestock, and for verified loss of livestock for ranchers who participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

The department, in accordance with policies established by the commission, may provide for the feeding of game birds, mammals, or fish at such times as natural foods therefor are not available, and may provide suitable area or areas for such feeding, and may for those purposes expend such money as is necessary from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

The department shall provide for the feeding of deer wherever the director finds that natural forage is unavailable therefor due to excessive snow. The times, extent, and manner of such feeding shall be prescribed by the director. In carrying out the provisions of this section neither the department nor the director shall be bound by any policy determination or regulation of the commission, it being the purpose of this section to commit to the independent discretion of the director all matters within the purview of this section.
